Tennessee, session 114, HB1995.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-3115, is amended by deleting
the section and substituting instead the following:
An LEA or public charter school may retain a student in third grade if the student
has not shown a basic understanding of the curriculum and an ability to perform the
skills required in the subject of reading or English language arts (ELA), as demonstrated
by the student's grades or standardized test results.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-1-905(d), is amended by deleting
subdivision (4).
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it,
and applies to the 2025-2026 school year and each school year thereafter.
HB1995
009465
- 1 -